Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-103
Rules.

A court of impeachment shall make such rules and orders as in its discretion shall be best adapted to a full, fair, and impartial investigation of the charges made, and to the promotion of substantial justice.

Laws 1879, § 3, p. 82;

R.S.1913, § 1130;

C.S.1922, § 1059;

C.S.1929, § 27-103;

R.S.1943, § 24-103.